Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-120.01
Terms, defined.

As used in section 48-120, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Plastic surgery shall mean that branch of surgery concerned with the repair or restoration of lost, injured, or deformed body parts chiefly by transfer of tissue; and

(2) Reconstructive surgery shall mean surgery which restores or tends to restore an injured or deformed structure.

Laws 1978, LB 529, § 1.